Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-8,110.14
Examining board; record of proceedings and applications for licensure; confidential.

The examining board shall keep a record of its proceedings and a record of all applications for licensure. The information and data retained by the examining board in its files for individual applicants shall be considered confidential records and shall not be disclosed to any applicant or the public for any reason.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 16;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 27.
September 1, 2024